Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-477
Certain animals
kept in captivity; permit required; exceptions; rules and regulations.

(1) No person shall keep in captivity in this state any wild
birds, any wild mammals, any nongame wildlife in need of conservation as determined
by the commission under section 37-805, or any wildlife determined to be an
endangered or threatened species under the Endangered Species Act or section
37-806 without first having obtained a permit to do so as provided by section
37-478 or 37-479.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section,
no person shall keep in captivity in this state any wolf, any skunk, or any
member of the families Felidae and Ursidae. This subsection shall not apply
to (a) the species Felis domesticus, (b) any zoo, park, refuge, wildlife area,
or nature center owned or operated by a city, village, state, or federal agency or any zoo accredited by the Association
of Zoos and Aquariums or the Zoological Association of America,
or (c) any person who holds a captive wildlife permit issued pursuant to section
37-479 and who raises Canada Lynx (Lynx canadensis) or bobcats (Lynx rufus)
solely for the purpose of producing furs for sale to individuals or businesses
or for the purpose of producing breeding stock for sale to persons engaged
in fur production.

(3) Any person legally holding in captivity, on March 1,
1986, any animal subject to the prohibition contained in subsection (2) of
this section shall be allowed to keep the animal for the duration of its life.
Such animal shall not be traded, sold, or otherwise disposed of without written
permission from the commission.

(4) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
governing the purchase, possession, propagation, sale, and barter of wild
birds, wild mammals, and wildlife in captivity.

Laws 1957, c. 151, § 1, p. 490;

Laws 1971, LB 733, § 9;

Laws 1986, LB 558, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 379, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-713;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 187;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 56;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 23.